District of Columbia statutes.
3-1209.07

Nursing assistive personnel.

(a)

Persons who are engaged as nursing assistive personnel in the District shall register with the Mayor, renew the registration as required by rule, and pay the required registration fee established by the Mayor.

(b)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules setting forth the standards of education and experience required to qualify as nursing assistive personnel.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 907
as added July 7, 2009, D.C. Law 18-18, § 2(f), 56 DCR 3624